Washington statutes.
RCW 10.19.055

Class A or B felony offenses—Bail for release determined by judicial officer.

Bail for the release of a person arrested and detained for a class A or B felony offense must be determined on an individualized basis by a judicial officer.

[ 2012 c 6 s 1; 2010 c 254 s 2.]